Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.090

Testimony reduced to writing.

Every witness so attending shall be examined on oath or affirmation, and his or her testimony shall be reduced to writing by the commissioner, or by some disinterested person in his or her presence and under the direction of said commissioner, and signed by the witness.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6008; 1895 c 6 s 8; RRS s 8185.]